California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(v) Strategies to ensure that children and families retain coverage and are informed of options for health coverage and services when they lose eligibility for a particular program.

(vi) Plans to inform families about all available health care programs and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 199.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14067.3.

(a) (1) The department may maintain an allocation program for the management and funding of county outreach and enrollment plans to enroll and retain eligible children in the Medi-Cal program and the Healthy Families Program.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and in a manner that the director shall provide, the department may allocate an amount to fund county outreach and enrollment plans identified in this section.

(b) (1) The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in the 2006–07 fiscal year, and thereafter adjusted proportionately on a pro rata basis contingent upon the annual appropriation, but not less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), shall be set aside, from the annual allocation for purposes of this section, for counties identified in subdivision (d).

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the total of all county allocations made pursuant to this section shall not exceed the annual appropriation for the implementation of this section.

(c) The director shall make allocations to not more than 20 counties that have the highest number of children who appear to be eligible for the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program, as determined by the director, but who are not currently enrolled in either
 program, and the highest number of Medi-Cal program and Healthy Families Program cases for children. This number shall be weighted to emphasize those who appear eligible, but are not currently enrolled in the programs.

(d) With funds set aside under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the director shall make allocations to those counties that have an existing infrastructure for outreach, enrollment, retention, and utilization, and that can demonstrate they have well established and documented county coalitions for children’s coverage with organizations such as community-based organizations, schools, clinics, labor organizations, and other safety net providers in place for at least 12 months.

(e) (1) To obtain an allocation authorized under this section, a county shall submit an allocation plan, which shall include an outreach and enrollment plan, as outlined in
 paragraph (2). The director shall establish the procedures and format for submission to the department of all county allocation plans.

(2) The following shall constitute the minimum components required of a county outreach and enrollment plan:

(A) An active collaboration with a wide range of organizations, such as community-based organizations, schools, clinics, labor organizations, and other safety net providers.

(B) A streamlined application assistance process.

(C) Establishment of an oversight, performance management, and review program to ensure that the outreach and enrollment plan submitted by the county is properly implemented and administered.

(D) A description of each of the
 following:

(i) The amount of the current funding and funding source for application, enrollment, retention, and utilization activities.

(ii) The current application, enrollment, retention, and utilization activities.

(iii) How the allocation funds awarded under this section will be used to supplement and not supplant existing application, enrollment, retention, and utilization activities.

(E) A detailed proposed budget of all expenditures for the relevant fiscal year or years for the county’s outreach and enrollment plan activities, expenses, services, materials, and support.

(f) Counties receiving an allocation under this section shall provide reports to the department, as determined by
 the department, on the progress made in achieving the objectives of the allocation plan.

(g) (1) The funds allocated under this section shall be used only for outreach, enrollment, retention, and utilization. The funds allocated under this section may supplement, but shall not supplant, existing local, state, and foundation funding of county outreach, enrollment, retention, and utilization activities. Notwithstanding Section 10744, the department may recoup or withhold all or part of a county’s allocation for failure to comply with the standards set forth in the county’s outreach and enrollment plan upon which the allocation was based.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, any acquisitions made with funds allocated under this section shall be made in compliance with federal law.

(h) Reimbursements for costs incurred under the allocation plan authorized under this section shall be made in arrears and in a manner as provided by the director. The allocations may be used only to fund activities provided in each of the designated fiscal years and in accordance with the county’s approved outreach and enrollment plan and budget for the fiscal year.

(i) As authorized by the director, on a case by case basis, funds allocated pursuant to this section may be used to support automated enrollment of children in the Medi-Cal program or the Healthy Families Program. Funds under this subdivision shall further the goal of increasing the enrollment of uninsured children, as well as increasing the retention of children, in the Medi-Cal program and Healthy Families Program in the same fiscal year for which the funds are allocated.

(j) The department and the
 Managed Risk Medical Insurance Board shall seek approval of any amendments to the state plan necessary to implement this section for purposes of funding under Titles XIX and XXI of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Secs. 1396 et seq. and 1397aa et seq., respectively). This section shall be implemented only when federal approvals have been obtained and only to the extent federal financial participation is available.

(k) The department shall reimburse a county pursuant to this section in lieu of commencing a cooperative agreement or contract with a county for the operation of an outreach program.

(l) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions.

(m) For the purposes of this section, “county outreach and enrollment plan” means a county outreach program designed to identify and enroll children who are eligible either for the Healthy Families Program or the Medi-Cal program, but are not currently enrolled in either program, and to facilitate the retention of eligible children currently enrolled in these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 74, Sec. 63.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14067.5.

The department shall encourage counties to outstation additional Medi-Cal eligibility workers in nontraditional sites, such as schools, private hospitals, clinics, mental health centers, sites providing services under California Supplemental Food Program for Women, Infants, and Children sites, and community-based organizations. The department shall permit counties to redirect a portion of existing funding for Medi-Cal eligibility administration for this purpose. The department shall require counties that redirect funds to provide an annual report on the cost of
 the additional outstationed workers and their effectiveness in increasing or facilitating Medi-Cal enrollment. Expenditures under this section shall be subject to the availability of federal financial participation, and shall not cause an increase in the allocation of funds for the administration of the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 66.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14068.

In conducting outreach activities for the enrollment of special needs populations into a Medi-Cal managed care program, the department and its contractors, as deemed applicable by the department, shall work with state, local, and regional organizations with the ability to target low-income seniors and individuals with disabilities in the communities where they live. This shall include, but not be limited to, all applicable state departments that serve these individuals, regional centers, seniors’ organizations, local health consumer centers, and other
 consumer-focused organizations that are engaging in providing assistance to this population.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 74, Sec. 64.   Effective July 12, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Physicians Costs [14075. - 14080.5.]

14075.

The Legislature intends that Medi-Cal recipients have reasonable access to medical care services and especially to primary and maternity care services. In order to obtain such access, the Legislature intends that, to the extent feasible and permitted by federal law, physicians be reimbursed equally statewide for comparable services, at a rate sufficient to provide Medi-Cal recipients with such reasonable access, and also intends that higher rates be paid, relatively, for providing primary and maternity care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

14076.

As used in this article:

(a) “Medically underserved area” means a county, standard metropolitan statistical area, or other area within the state in which the director determines that Medi-Cal recipients do not have access to an adequate number of physicians.

(b) “Primary care services” means those general medical services, as determined by the director, which are not performed on an emergency, referral, or consulting basis.

(c) “Maternity care services” are prenatal, postnatal,
 perinatal, and neonatal services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

14077.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter the director shall establish, within 15 days of the effective date of this act a statewide, uniform schedule for reimbursing physician services to Medi-Cal patients provided on or after July 1, 1976; except that, the director may establish physician reimbursement rates higher than the statewide rates for; (a) areas which the director determines to be medically underserved: and (b) other problems of equity in payment levels which adversely affect the accessibility of physician services to Medi-Cal recipients. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the director from adopting physician reimbursement rates for
 primary care services and maternity care services which are relatively higher than the rates paid for other types of physician services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

14078.

The director shall establish, at the time he or she establishes the statewide rate for physician services required by Section 14077, a level of reimbursement for physician services which represents at least an average increase over the statewide average amounts paid under the Medi-Cal program for the three-month period ending February 29, 1976, of 9.5 percent for all physician services except primary care services and maternity care services; of 20 percent for primary care services; and of 30 percent for maternity care services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1207.)
-------------------------------------------

14079.

(a) The director shall periodically review the reimbursement levels for physician and dental services in the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system, and shall periodically revise the rates of reimbursement to physicians and dentists to the extent the director deems necessary to comply with applicable federal Medicaid program requirements, including provisions on reasonable access to physician and dental services for Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(b) To the extent consistent with the department’s federally approved access monitoring plan, or any successor methodology for monitoring reasonable access to Medi-Cal covered services, as
 described in Section 1396a(a)(30)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code, this periodic review, as it relates to rates for physician services, shall take into account at least the following factors:

(1) Annual cost increases for physicians as reflected by the Consumer Price Index.

(2) Physician reimbursement levels under the Medicare Program.

(3) Prevailing customary physician charges within the state and in various geographical areas.

(4) Characteristics of the current population of Medi-Cal beneficiaries and the medical services needed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 56.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14079.5.

Rates of reimbursement established pursuant to this chapter shall make no distinction based on whether a particular service is provided by a physician or a dentist. The director shall not reduce any rate of reimbursement for physician services in order to comply with this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 995, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14080.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, reimbursement to providers for dental services provided to individuals 21 years of age or older at the time of services shall be limited to not more than one thousand eight hundred dollars ($1,800) per beneficiary in any calendar year, commencing January 1, 2006. This limitation shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Emergency dental services within the scope of covered dental benefits defined as a dental condition
 manifesting itself by acute symptoms of sufficient severity such that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected to result in placing the health of the individual in serious jeopardy, serious impairment to bodily functions, or serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.

(2) Services that are federally mandated under Part 440 (commencing with Section 440.1) of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations, including pregnancy-related services and services for other conditions that might complicate the pregnancy.

(3) Dentures.

(4) Maxillofacial and complex oral surgery.

(5) Maxillofacial services, including dental implants and implant-retained prostheses.

(6) Services provided in long-term care facilities.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions. No later than January 1, 2008, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) The department shall pursue any state plan amendment or other federal approval necessary in order to effectuate this section. This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 758, Sec. 35.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14080.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, no increase in the reimbursement levels for physician and dental services under Medi-Cal shall be made for the period from July 1, 1982, to September 30, 1982, inclusive, except to the extent funds may be provided therefor by the Budget Act of 1982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 115, Sec. 51.   Effective March 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Selective Provider Contracts [14081. - 14087.29.]

14081.

It is the purpose of this article to ensure that the Medi-Cal program shall be operated in the most cost-effective and efficient manner possible with the optimum number of inpatient hospital service providers. In order to carry out this purpose it is the specific intent of the Legislature that the special negotiator have maximum discretion and flexibility in order to select among various methods of arranging for the provision of health services while achieving significant cost savings. This article shall be the exclusive means of providing inpatient hospital services to recipients qualifying for such care under this
 chapter.

All previously eligible hospitals may continue to participate in the Medi-Cal program and receive reimbursement for the provision of inpatient hospital services under this article until the special negotiator has negotiated contracts with a sufficient number of hospitals to assure bed capacity to meet the needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries in an area and notifies the hospital that it is no longer eligible to serve Medi-Cal inpatients except as provided for in Section 14087. A determination by the negotiator under this section shall not require a hearing under Section 14123 or any other section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1594, Sec. 35.   Effective September 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14081.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares the need to improve the reporting relationship between the state and hospitals eligible to contract with the state for the provision of inpatient services to Medi-Cal eligible persons as provided for in the Medi-Cal reform legislation enacted during the 1981–82 Legislative Session.

(b) Existing statutes require hospitals to file a multiplicity of reports with various state agencies for a variety of purposes, including, but not limited to, the development of Medi-Cal reimbursement rates for inpatient services. The Medi-Cal reform
 legislation enacted during the 1981–82 Legislative Session significantly altered the manner in which hospitals are reimbursed under the program for these services, thereby establishing the opportunity to redefine and restructure the existing hospital reporting requirements.

(c) It is the Legislature’s intent, therefore, that the existing reporting requirements be reviewed and revised for efficiency, wherever possible, with consideration given to the development of a consolidated, single, multipurpose report for use by all state agencies.

(d) It is the Legislature’s further intent that, in determining these efficiencies, the purposes for which the reports are required be preserved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1120, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14081.5.

Hospitals that are not selected for contracting under this article and that have negotiated in good faith to obtain a contract need not fulfill preexisting obligations relating to the provision of inpatient services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries arising under Section 15459 of the Government Code, and subdivision (j) of Section 129050 of, paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 127175 of, the Health and Safety Code, so long as this article remains in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 470.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14082.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Governor shall designate a person in his office to act as a special negotiator to negotiate rates, terms, and conditions for contracts with hospitals for inpatient services to be rendered to Medi-Cal program beneficiaries. The negotiator may also, if he or she deems it expedient, call for bids, in lieu of negotiations. The special negotiator shall consider, when contracting, the total funds appropriated for inpatient hospital services.

The department and every other
 state agency concerned with health care or public social services shall provide such assistance as the negotiator may require. The department shall enter into contracts with hospitals and shall be bound by the rates, terms, and conditions negotiated by the negotiator.

The negotiator shall have the powers of a head of a department pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11150) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except, that he or she shall adopt only such rules and regulations pursuant to Section 11152 of the Government Code as are necessary to carry out those duties specifically conferred upon the negotiator by Articles 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089), and 2.92 (commencing with Section 14090) of this chapter.

The negotiator shall adopt such regulations as emergency regulations in accordance with the provisions of
 Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For the purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted in accordance with this section shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

In addition to the powers specified in this section, the negotiator has the authority to negotiate contracts under Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089), and Article 2.92
 (commencing with Section 14090) of this chapter. Also, the California Medical Assistance Commission shall have the authority to enter into contracts for the provision of acute inpatient hospital services for the care of County Medical Services Program beneficiaries pursuant to Section 16809 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

Nothing in this article or the Budget Act of 1984 prohibits the negotiator from adjusting rates paid to hospitals to reflect inflation, provided that such adjustments are determined during the negotiating process.

The amendment of this section made at the 1983–84 Regular Session of the Legislature does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 68.5.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14082.5.

The negotiator provided for in Section 14082 shall serve in such capacity for the 1982–83 fiscal year, after which his or her functions shall be assumed by the California Medical Assistance Commission. Commencing on July 1, 1983, any reference in this article or in Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), and Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089) of this chapter to the negotiator shall be deemed to be references to the California Medical Assistance Commission.

As of July 1, 1983, the negotiator shall serve as the executive director of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 328, Sec. 17.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14083.

The factors to be considered by the negotiator in negotiating contracts under this article, or in drawing specifications for competitive bidding, include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Beneficiary access.

(b) Utilization controls.

(c) Ability to render quality services efficiently and economically.

(d) Demonstrated ability to provide or arrange needed specialized services.

(e) Protection against fraud and abuse.

(f) Any other factor which would reduce costs, promote access, or enhance the quality of care.

(g) The capacity to provide a given tertiary service, such as specialized children’s services, on a regional basis.

(h) Recognition of the variations in severity of illness and complexity of care.

(i) Existing labor-management collective bargaining agreements.

(j) The situation of county hospitals and university medical centers contracting with counties for provision of health care to indigent persons entitled to care under Section 17000, which are burdened to a greater extent than private hospitals with bad debts, indirect costs, medical education programs, and capital needs.

(k) The special circumstances of hospitals serving a disproportionate number of Medi-Cal beneficiaries and patients who are not covered by other third-party payers, including the costs associated with assuring an adequate supply of registered nurses.

(l) The costs of providing complex emergency services, including the costs of meeting and maintaining state and local requirements for trauma center designation.

(m) The hospital does
 any of the following:

(1) Provides additional obstetrical beds.

(2) Contracts with one or more comprehensive perinatal providers.

(3) Permits certified nurse midwives, subject to hospital rules, and consistent with existing laws and regulations, to admit patients to the health facility.

(4) Expands overall obstetrical services in the hospital.

(n) The special circumstances of hospitals whose Medi-Cal inpatient utilization rate exceeds the mean Medicaid inpatient utilization rate by at least one-half of one standard deviation.

(o) The ability and capacity of the contracting hospital in a closed health facility planning area to
 provide health care services to beneficiaries who are in life-threatening or emergency situations, but have been sufficiently stabilized at another noncontracting facility in order to facilitate transportation to the contracting hospital.

(p) The ability of the contracting hospital to provide a secure environment for the provision of health care services. In this regard, the negotiator shall consider additional security measures that the contracting hospital may have taken to provide a secure environment, including, but not limited to, the use of detection equipment or procedures to detect lethal weapons, the appropriate use of surveillance cameras, limiting access of unauthorized personnel to the emergency department, installation of bullet proof glass as appropriate in designated areas, the use of emergency “panic” buttons to alert local law enforcement agencies, and assigning full-time security personnel to the emergency
 department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 244.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14083.5.

In addition to considering factors specified in Section 14083, the negotiator, in negotiating contracts under this article, or in drawing specifications for competitive bidding, shall give special consideration to the reimbursement issues faced by hospitals caring for Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are receiving treatment for acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS).

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1470, Sec. 1.   Effective September 30, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

14084.

(a) Payments to the contractor may be either on a capitation or prepayment basis, or on a combination of both methods of payment, or such other methods as the negotiator determines to be feasible. Hospitals may assume all or part of the risk of utilization of services, or costs of services, or both.

(b) The department shall insure that the system for reimbursing contracting hospitals is capable of making contract payments in the manner determined pursuant to subdivision (a). At a minimum, the department shall insure that the reimbursement system is capable of making
 contract payments on a per diem and a per case basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1315, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14085.

All utilization controls applied to inpatient hospital services by the director in accordance with Section 14133.1 shall continue to be applied to inpatient hospital services rendered under this article, except that the director may waive utilization controls which are no longer necessary in the case of hospitals entering into negotiated, capitated, at-risk contracts under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 328, Sec. 17.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14085.5.

(a) Each disproportionate share hospital contracting to provide services under this article or contracting with a county organized health system, and which has or would have met the state criteria developed pursuant to the federal medicaid requirements regarding disproportionate hospitals for the three most recent years prior to submitting final plans for an eligible project in accordance with subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), may, in addition to the rate of payment provided for in the contract entered
 into under this article, receive supplemental reimbursement to the extent provided for in this section.

(b) (1) (A) A hospital qualifying pursuant to subdivision (a) shall submit documentation regarding debt service on revenue bonds used for financing the construction, renovation, or replacement of hospital facilities, including buildings and fixed equipment.

(B) Qualified hospitals may submit debt service instruments to the department and to the commission regarding debt issued for new capital projects.

(C) Eligible projects shall include those new capital projects funded by new debt for which final plans have been submitted to the Office of the State Architect and the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development after September 1, 1988, and prior to June 30, 1994,
 except that projects submitted between September 1, 1988, and June 30, 1989, shall be eligible only if the submitting hospital had all of the following additional characteristics during the 1989 calendar year:

(i) No less than 400 general acute care licensed beds.

(ii) An average Medi-Cal patient census of not less than 30 percent of the total patient days.

(iii) No less than 50,000 emergency department visits.

(iv) An existing basic emergency department, obstetrical services, and a neonatal intensive care unit.

(D) The department shall confirm in writing hospital and project eligibility for partial financing under this section.

(E) Department advisory letters, conditioned on hospital and project conformity to plans, may be requested by hospitals prior to final plan submission.

(F) Capital projects receiving partial financing under this section shall finance the upgrading or construction of buildings and equipment to a level required by currently accepted medical practice standards, including projects designed to correct Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals and Health Systems fire and life safety, seismic, or other related regulatory standards.

(2) Projects may also expand service capacity as needed to maintain current or reasonably foreseeable necessary bed capacity to meet the needs of Medi-Cal beneficiaries after giving consideration to bed capacity needed for other patients, including unsponsored patients.

(3) (A) Debt service shall only be paid for projects, or for that portion of projects, that are available and accessible to patients treated under this article or by successor programs.

(B) Each project shall cost at least five million dollars ($5,000,000) or, if less than five million dollars ($5,000,000), the project shall be necessary for retention of federal and state licensing and certification and for meeting fire and life safety, seismic, or other related regulatory standards.

(4) Supplemental reimbursement payments shall commence no later than 30 days after receipt of the certificate of occupancy by the hospital.

(5) (A) The state shall pledge to, and agree with, the holders of any revenue bonds issued to finance projects qualifying under this section
 that until debt service on the revenue bonds is fully paid, or until the supplemental rate is no longer required as provided by this section, the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in the hospital to receive supplemental reimbursement pursuant to this section.

(B) The state shall pledge, and the hospital shall, as a condition of encumbering supplemental reimbursement payments received pursuant to this section, pledge that supplemental reimbursement payments shall be used for the payment of debt service on the revenue bonds. The hospital shall include its pledge and the agreement with the state in any agreement with the holders of the revenue bonds.

(c) The hospital’s supplemental reimbursement for a project qualifying pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be calculated as follows:

(1) For any fiscal
 year for which the hospital is eligible to receive reimbursement, the hospital shall report to the department the amount of debt service on the revenue bonds issued to finance the project.

(2) (A) The department shall use the medicaid inpatient utilization rate as determined pursuant to Section 4112 of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1987 (Public Law 100-203) to determine the ratio of the hospital’s total paid Medi-Cal patient days to total patient days.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in determining the hospital’s medicaid inpatient utilization rate for the purposes of this section, the department shall include in both the numerator and denominator all Medi-Cal inpatient days of care provided by the hospital after December 31, 1994, to Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are enrolled in prepaid health plans
 contracting with the department. Where reliable data regarding those days are available from Medi-Cal prepaid health plans contracting with participating hospitals for services rendered prior to January 1, 1995, that data may be used by the department in the calculations.

(ii) For purposes of this section, Medi-Cal prepaid health plan programs, and the days relating thereto, shall include, but not be limited to, the programs listed in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 14105.985, Section 14089, and any prepaid programs implemented under Section 14087.3, including the two-plan model described in the report issued on March 31, 1993, by the department, entitled “The State Department of Health Services’ Plan for Expanding Medi-Cal Managed Care: Protecting Vulnerable Populations.”

(3) (A) (i) The supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement
 to the hospital for each fiscal year shall equal the amount determined annually in paragraph (1) multiplied by the percentage figure determined in paragraph (2). In no instance shall the percentage figure determined pursuant to the ratio derived under paragraph (2) be decreased by more than 10 percent of the initial ratio determined pursuant to paragraph (2) prior to the retirement of the debt.

(ii) Hospitals whose Medi-Cal ratio falls below 90 percent of the initial level established at the point of final plan submission shall at least maintain the volume of Medi-Cal utilization which was recorded at the time of final plan submission unless forces beyond the hospital’s control have decreased the absolute volume of care.

(B) (i) In no instance shall the total amount of reimbursement received under this section combined with that received from all other
 sources dedicated exclusively to debt service exceed 100 percent of the debt service over the life of the loan.

(ii) A hospital qualifying for and receiving supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement shall continue to receive the reimbursement until the qualifying loan is paid off, or the hospital is terminated as a Medi-Cal selective contractor and the hospital does not contract with a county organized health system.

(iii) It is the intent of the Legislature that the state and the qualifying hospital shall negotiate in good faith for rates sufficient to ensure continued hospital participation in the program and to ensure adequate access to services for Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(iv) The state shall not terminate a contract with a qualified provider for the purpose of terminating the capital supplement.

(v) If negotiations fail to permit continuation of a contract of a hospital qualifying for the supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement, the supplemental Medi-Cal reimbursement shall cease as of the date of discontinuance of the selective provider contract.

(4) In order to ensure provision of qualified supplemental payments to disproportionate share hospitals contracting with county organized health systems, the department shall make the qualified supplemental payments directly to these hospitals.

(5) Funding for these supplemental payments shall be separately appropriated as a line item in the Budget Act for each fiscal year for any project for which a request for payment is received after April 1 of each fiscal year. The department shall request a deficiency appropriation if funds for the payment are not appropriated in
 the Budget Act. 

(6) (A) Paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, shall be incorporated into an amendment to any contract entered into by a hospital pursuant to this article.

(B) (i) Any contract amendment required by paragraph (A) shall include a payment methodology based on inpatient hospital services rendered to Medi-Cal patients, either on a per diem basis, a per-discharge basis, or any other federally permissible basis, and which is consistent with the hospital’s Medi-Cal contract.

(ii) The payment methodology specified in clause (i) shall ensure that the hospital, on an annual basis, receives the amount of supplemental reimbursement calculated pursuant to paragraph (3), excluding only the federal portion of costs which have been determined by the federal government not to be
 allowable under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (Subchapter 19 (commencing with Section 1396) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code).

(iii) The payment methodology specified in clause (i) shall contain a retrospective adjustment mechanism to ensure that, regardless of the payment methodology, the department shall pay the hospital the full amount owed to the hospital for the year, as determined pursuant to this section.

(7) In negotiating contracts with hospitals receiving payments under this section, the commission shall take appropriate steps to ensure the duplicate payments are not made to the hospital for the debt service costs relating to the eligible project.

(d) All reimbursement received by a hospital pursuant to this section shall be placed in a special account, the funds in which
 shall be used exclusively for the payment of debt service on the revenue bonds issued to finance the project.

(e) If contracting under this section is superseded by other arrangements for payment of inpatient hospital services, the successor program shall include separate reimbursement, as determined pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(f) (1) For purposes of this section, “revenue bonds” are defined as that term is defined in subdivision (c) of Section 15459 of the Government Code, and shall also include general obligation bonds issued by or on behalf of eligible hospitals for projects of more than five million dollars ($5,000,000).

(2) (A) The aggregate principal amount of general obligation bonds to be issued as revenue bonds under this subdivision for the
 anticipated allowable portion of projects shall not, in any fiscal year, exceed a statewide amount established in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted to the fiscal committees of the Legislature pursuant to Section 14100.5, or as otherwise statutorily determined by the Legislature.

(B) In preparing Medi-Cal estimates, the department shall consider, but need not include, all actual and anticipated projects.
